Massachusetts, session 194th, H1360.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Section 1 of chapter 151B of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2020 
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out, in line 138, the word “handicap” and 
inserting in place thereof the following word:- disability. 
SECTION 2. Section 4 of said chapter 151B, as so appearing, is hereby amended by 
adding the following subsection:- 
(a) As used in this subsection, the following words shall have the following meaning 
unless the context clearly requires otherwise: 
“Disability”, shall have the same meaning as defined in section 1 of chapter 151B. 

of 5 9  “Short-term survival”, an individual’s assessed probability of surviving an acute illness 
from which they are presently suffering and being successfully discharged from a hospital or 
other inpatient medical facility. 
(b) It shall be an unlawful practice: 
(i) For any public or private entity or agency of the commonwealth, to approve or 
implement a plan for the distribution of scarce healthcare resources during a crisis, including, but 
not limited to, crisis standards of care implemented during a public health emergency, that deny 
an individual lifesaving treatment or place an individual at reduced priority for lifesaving 
treatment if such a determination is based on:  
(A) a presumption that an individual has a reduced quality of life due to a disability or 
chronic health condition;  
(B) a presumption that an individual’s life is less worth saving due to a disability or 
chronic health condition; or  
(C) any measure, metric, or third party analysis which has the effect of setting a value for 
the life of an individual or individuals with a specific disability or medical diagnosis that is less 
than the value given to the life of an individual or individuals without a disability; provided 
however that this subsection shall not prohibit such a plan from considering an individual’s 
prospects for short-term survival in determining whether they are prioritized for care. 
(ii) For any public or private entity or agency of the commonwealth, to withhold any 
medical treatment to an individual based on:  

of 5 29  (A) a presumption that an individual has a reduced quality of life due to a disability or 
chronic health condition;  
(B) a presumption that an individual’s life is less worth saving due to a disability or 
chronic health condition; or  
(C) any measure, metric, or third party analysis which has the effect of setting a value for 
the life of an individual or individuals with a specific disability or medical diagnosis that is less 
than the value given to the life of an individual or individuals without a disability. 
(iii) For any public or private entity or agency of the commonwealth, when determining 
whether a healthcare treatment should be available within a formulary, or determining the value 
of a healthcare treatment, to employ a measure or metric which assigns a reduced value to the 
life extension provided by a treatment based on a pre-existing disability or chronic health 
condition of the individuals whom the treatment would benefit. 
(iv) For a hospital or other entity engaged in the provision of healthcare to:  
(A) condition the provision of procedures or treatment on an individual having an order 
to not resuscitate, POLST (Physician Orders for Life-Sustaining Treatment), advance directive or 
any instruction relating to the administration, withholding or withdrawing of life-sustaining 
procedures or artificially administered nutrition and hydration;  
(B) communicate to any individual or person acting on behalf of the individual, before or 
after admission to the hospital, 

of 5 48  that treatment is conditioned on the individual having an order to not resuscitate, an 
advance directive or any instruction relating to the administration, withholding or withdrawing of 
life-sustaining procedures or artificially administered nutrition and hydration;  
(C) suggest to any individual, or person acting on behalf of the individual, who contacts 
the hospital regarding treatment for the individual that admission or treatment is conditioned on 
the individual having an order to not resuscitate, an advance directive or any instruction relating 
to the administration, withholding or withdrawing of life-sustaining procedures or artificially 
administered nutrition and hydration; or  
(D) discriminate in any other way against an individual based on whether the individual 
has an order to not resuscitate, an advance directive or any instruction relating to the 
administration, withholding or withdrawing of life-sustaining procedures or artificially 
administered nutrition and hydration. 
(c) This subsection shall not prohibit a hospital from providing written materials and 
information about advance directives to an individual or prohibit a licensed health care 
professional from engaging in a discussion with an individual about the written materials and 
information, so long as the professional does not disproportionately advise an individual to sign 
an advanced directive based on the race, ethnicity, gender, sexuality, or disability status of said 
individual. 
(d) Nothing in this subsection shall prevent healthcare practitioners, hospitals or other 
healthcare entities from providing a medically appropriate course of treatment to an individual 
that they believe will extend that individual’s life, improve their symptoms or alleviate pain and 
suffering. 

of 5 70  (e) The secretary of health and human services shall promulgate regulations to implement 
this subsection. 
SECTION 3. The secretary of health and human services shall promulgate regulations for 
the implementation of subsection 20 of section 4 of chapter 151B not later than 60 days after the 
effective date of this act.